src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-A-nohkowa_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - nohkowa - ok : # -m animate noun, my son AEW NA1
     nohkowa+NAD+Px1Sg+Sg: nohkowa
     nohkowa+NAD+Px1Sg+Pl: nohkoiksi
     nohkowa+NAD+Px1Sg+Obv: nohkoyi
     nohkowa+NAD+Px1Sg+Non: nohkoi
     
     nohkowa+NAD+Px1Pl+Sg: nohkoinnaana
     nohkowa+NAD+Px1Pl+Pl: nohkoinnaaniksi
     nohkowa+NAD+Px1Pl+Obv: nohkoinnaani
     nohkowa+NAD+Px1Pl+Non: nohkoinnaani

     nohkowa+NAD+Px21Pl+Sg: kohkoinnoona
     nohkowa+NAD+Px21Pl+Pl: kohkoinnooniksi
     nohkowa+NAD+Px21Pl+Obv: kohkoinnooni
     nohkowa+NAD+Px21Pl+Non: kohkoinnooni

     nohkowa+NAD+Px2Sg+Sg: kohkowa
     nohkowa+NAD+Px2Sg+Pl: kohkoiksi
     nohkowa+NAD+Px2Sg+Obv: kohkoyi
     nohkowa+NAD+Px2Sg+Non: kohkoi

     nohkowa+NAD+Px2Pl+Sg: kohkowaawa
     nohkowa+NAD+Px2Pl+Pl: kohkowaawaiksi
     nohkowa+NAD+Px2Pl+Obv: kohkowaawayi
     nohkowa+NAD+Px2Pl+Non: kohkowaawai

     nohkowa+NAD+Px3Sg+Obv: ohkoyi
     nohkowa+NAD+Px3Sg+Non: ohkoi

     nohkowa+NAD+Px3Pl+Obv: ohkowaawayi
     nohkowa+NAD+Px3Pl+Non: ohkowaawai

    
